Louisiana, session 2026, HB98.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1078(F) and (G) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1078. Protections required for victims of the crime of domestic violence
* * *
F. Whoever intentionally releases, discloses, transfers, or disseminates for
publication any information related to the abuse status of an applicant or insured for
any purpose not provided in Subsection D of this Section with the intent to coerce,
intimidate, or harass any person shall be imprisoned with or without hard labor for
not more than one year, fined not more than two thousand five hundred dollars, or
both.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 98 ENROLLED
G. No community-based shelter that provides services to a subject of abuse
shall be liable for any unlawful release, disclosure, transfer, or dissemination of
information that is made by an individual in violation of Subsection F of this Section.
Section 2. R.S. 40:2024.5(F) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
40:2024.5(H) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2024.5. Records; confidentiality; prohibited disclosure and discovery
* * *
F. A member of the review panel, or any local or regional panel or agent of
a local or regional panel, may shall not disclose any information that is confidential
under pursuant to this Section. A person who appears before, participates in, or
provides information to the review panel, or any local or regional panel or agent of
a local or regional panel, shall sign a confidentiality notice to acknowledge that any
information he provides to the review panel, or any local or regional panel or agent
of a local or regional panel, shall be confidential. Information identifying a victim
of domestic violence whose case is being reviewed, or that victim's family members,
or an alleged or suspected perpetrator of abuse upon the victim, or regarding the
involvement of any agency with the victim or victim's family members, shall not be
disclosed in any report that is available to the public. Nothing in this Section shall
prohibit prohibits the publishing by the review panel, or any local or regional panel
or agent of a local or regional panel, of statistical compilations relating to domestic
abuse fatalities which do not identify a person's case or person's healthcare provider,
law enforcement agency, or organization who provides services to victims.
* * *
H. Whoever violates the provisions of Subsection F of this Section with the
intent to coerce, intimidate, or harass any person shall be imprisoned with or without
hard labor for not more than one year, fined not more than two thousand five
hundred dollars, or both.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 98 ENROLLED
Section 3. R.S. 46:1844(W)(6), 1862(E), and 2124.1(E) and (F) are hereby enacted
to read as follows:
§1844. Basic rights for victim and witness
* * *
W. Confidentiality of crime victims who are minors, victims of sex offenses,
and victims of human trafficking-related offenses.
* * *
(6) Whoever intentionally releases, discloses, transfers, or disseminates for
publication any information contained in this Subsection in a manner prohibited by
this Subsection with the intent to coerce, intimidate, or harass any person shall be
imprisoned with or without hard labor for not more than one year, fined not more
than two thousand five hundred dollars, or both.
* * *
§1862. Confidentiality; information sharing
* * *
E. Any person subject to the provisions of this Section who intentionally
releases, discloses, transfers, or disseminates for publication any information
contained in this Section in a manner prohibited by this Section with the intent to
coerce, intimidate, or harass any person shall be imprisoned with or without hard
labor for not more than one year, fined not more than two thousand five hundred
dollars, or both.
* * *
§2124.1. Privileged communications and records
* * *
E. Whoever intentionally releases, discloses, transfers, or disseminates for
publication any information in a manner prohibited by this Section with the intent
to coerce, intimidate, or harass any person shall be imprisoned with or without hard
labor for not more than one year, fined not more than two thousand five hundred
dollars, or both.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 98 ENROLLED
F. No community shelter shall be liable for any unlawful release, disclosure,
transfer, or dissemination of information that is made by an individual in violation
of Subsection E of this Section.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.